Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-512
Sale of gas; rules and regulations; tolerances.

The Department of Agriculture is authorized to promulgate and adopt such rules and regulations and establish tolerances within a maximum of two percent, plus or minus, which may be necessary for the enforcement of sections 57-508 to 57-516.

Laws 1957, c. 240, § 5, p. 802.